Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EMERGENCY MEDICINE CAREER PATHWAYS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of labor and industry for a grant to Independent School District No. 294, Houston, for the Minnesota Virtual Academy's career pathways program, which may include up to two semesters of courses and must lead to eligibility for emergency medical responder or emergency medical technician certification. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Grant money may be used to encourage and support student participation in the career pathways program through additional academic, counseling, and other support services provided by the student's enrolling school district. The Minnesota Virtual Academy may contract with a student's enrolling school district to provide these services. new text end new text begin (c) The career pathways program must provide outreach to and encourage participation in its programming by students of color, Indigenous students, students from families with low income, students located throughout Minnesota, and underserved students. new text end new text begin (d) Beginning on January 15, 2027, and every year through January 15, 2029, Independent School District No. 294, Houston, must submit a written report to the legislative committees having jurisdiction over education and workforce development that: new text end new text begin (1) is in accordance with the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 3.195 and 127A.20; new text end new text begin (2) describes students' experiences with the program; new text end new text begin (3) documents the program's spending and the number of students participating in the program and entering into the apprenticeship program; new text end new text begin (4) includes geographic and demographic information on the program participants; new text end new text begin (5) makes recommendations to improve the support of career pathways programs statewide; and new text end new text begin (6) makes recommendations to improve student participation in career pathways programs. new text end